da: Flash-tilstande: Auto; Udfyld; Blitz slukket; Blitz tændt; Tvunget fra; Tvunget til; Højhastighedssynkronisering; Manuel; Multi; Normalt; Før-blitz; Bageste gardin; Reduktion af røde øjne; Anden gardinsynkronisering; Slave; Langsom synkronisering; Blød; Stroboskopisk; Undertrykt; TTL; Andet
en: Flash modes: Auto; Fill-in; Flash off; Flash on; Forced off; Forced on; High-speed sync; Manual; Multi; Normal; Pre-flash; Rear curtain; Red-eye reduction; Second curtain sync; Slave; Slow synchronization; Soft; Stroboscopic; Suppressed; TTL; Other
de: Blitzmodi: Auto; Ausfüllen; Blitz aus; Blitz an; Abgedrängt; Aufgezwungen; Hochgeschwindigkeitssynchronisierung; Manuell; Multi; Normal; Vorblitz; Zweiter Vorhang; Rote-Augen-Reduzierung; Synchronisierung des zweiten Vorhangs; Entfesselter Blitz; Langsame Synchronisierung; Weich; Stroboskopisch; Unterdrückt; TTL; Sonstiges
cs: Režimy blesku: Automatický; Vyplnění; Vypnutý blesk; Zapnutý blesk; Vynucené ukončení; Vynucený blesk; Rychlá synchronizace; Ruční; Více funkcí; Normální; Předblesk; Zadní lamela; Redukce červených očí; Synchronizace druhé clony; Podřízený; Pomalá synchronizace; Měkká; Stroboskopický; Potlačený; TTL; Jiné
ja: フラッシュモード: 自動; フィルイン; フラッシュオフ; フラッシュオン; 強制オフ; 強制オン; ハイスピードシンクロ; 手動; マルチ; 普通; プリ発光; 後幕; 赤目軽減; 後幕シンクロ; スレーブ; スローシンクロ; ソフト; ストロボ; 抑制; TTL; その他
sk-SK: Režimy nastavenia blesku: Auto; Vyplňovanie; Vypnutý blesk; Zapnutý blesk; Vynútené vypnutie; Vynútené zapnutie; Vysokorýchlostná synchronizácia; Manuálny; Viacnásobné; Normálny; Predblesk; Zadný záves; Redukcia červených očí; Synchronizácia druhej clony; Riadený; Pomalá synchronizácia; Mäkký; Stroboskopický; Potlačený; TTL; Iné
pt-PT: Modos de flash: Auto; Preenchimento; Flash desligado; Flash ligado; Desligamento forçado; Ligamento forçado; Sincronização rápida; Manual; Multi; Normal; Pré-flash; Cortina traseira; Redução de olhos vermelhos; Sincronização de segunda cortina; Secundário; Sincronização lenta; Suave; Estroboscópico; Suprimido; TTL; Outro
vi: Chế độ đèn nháy: Tự động; Bổ trợ; Tắt đèn flash; Bật đèn flash; Luôn tắt; Luôn bật; Đồng bộ hóa tốc độ cao; Xe lăn thủ công; Nhiều; Da thường; Flash trước; Màn sau; Giảm mắt đỏ; Đồng bộ hóa màn thứ hai; Flash phụ thuộc; Đồng bộ hóa chậm; Mềm; Chớp liên tục; Chặn; TTL; Khác
pt-BR: Modos do flash: Automático; Preenchimento; Flash desligado; Flash ligado; Forçado desligado; Forçado ligado; Sincronização de alta velocidade; Manual; Multi; Normal; Pré-flash; Cortina traseira; Redução de olhos vermelhos; Sincronização em segunda cortina; Escravo; Sincronização lenta; Macio; Estroboscópico; Suprimido; TTL; Outro
zh-TW: 閃光燈模式: 自動; 補光; 閃光關閉; 閃光開啟; 強制關閉; 強制開啟; 高速閃燈同步; 手動; 多重; 中性; 預閃; 後簾同步; 紅眼消除; 第二簾同步; 從屬; 慢速同步; 柔軟; 頻閃; 禁止; TTL; 其他
sl-SI: Načini bliskavice: Samodejno; Dopolnitev; Bliskavica izklopljena; Bliskavica vklopljena; Prisilno izključeno; Prisilno vključeno; Sinhronizacija visoke hitrosti; Ročno; Multi; Normalne; Predhodna bliskavica; Zadnja zavesa; Zmanjšanje učinka rdečih oči; Sinhronizacija druge zavese; Suženjska; Počasna sinhronizacija; Mehko; Stroboskopski; Zatrta; TTL; Drugo
sv: Blixtlägen: Auto; Fyllnadsblixt; Blixt av; Blixt på; Forcerat av; Forcerat på; Höghastighetssynkronisering; Manuell; Multi; Normalt; Förblixt; Andra ridån; Reducering av röda ögon; Synkronisering på andra ridån; Slav; Långsam synkronisering; Mjuk; Stroboskopisk; Dämpad; TTL; Övrigt
nb: Blitsmoduser: Auto; Fyll inn; Blits av; Blits på; Tvunget av; Tvunget på; Høyhastighetssynkronisering; Manuell; Multi; Normal; Forblits; Bakgardin; Reduksjon av røde øyne; Andre gardinsynkronisering; Slave; Sakte synkronisering; Myk; Stroboskopisk; Undertrykt; TTL; Annet
ru: Режимы вспышки: Авто; Заполняющая; Вспышка выключена; Вспышка включена; Принудительное выключение; Принудительное включение; Высокоскоростная синхронизация; Ручной; Мульти; Нормальный; Предварительная вспышка; Задняя шторка; Уменьшение эффекта красных глаз; Синхронизация по второй шторке; Вспомогательная; Медленная синхронизация; Мягкий; Стробоскопический; Подавлено; TTL; Другой
tr: Flaş Modları: Otomatik; Yedek; Flaş kapalı; Flaş açık; Her zaman kapalı; Her zaman açık; Yüksek hızlı senkronizasyon; Manuel; Multi; Normal; Ön flaş; Arka perde; Kırmızı göz azaltma; İkinci perde senkronizasyonu; Yardımcı flaş; Yavaş senkronizasyon; Yumuşak; Stroboskopik; Bastırılmış; TTL; Diğer
es: Modos de flash: Automático; Relleno; Flash desactivado; Flash encendido; Forzado desactivado; Forzado activado; Sincronización alta velocidad; Manual; Multi; Normal; Flash previo; Cortina trasera; Reducción de ojos rojos; Sincronización a la segunda cortinilla; Esclavo; Sincronización lenta; Blando; Estroboscópica; Suprimido; TTL; Otros
ro-RO: Moduri bliț: Auto; Fill-in; Bliț oprit; Bliț pornit; Pornit forțat; Oprit forțat; Sincronizare de mare viteză; Manual; Multi; Normal; Pre-bliț; Cortină spate; Reduce ochi roșii; Sincronizare a doua cortină; Secundar; Sincronizare lentă; Soft; Stroboscopic; Suprimat; TTL; Altele
lt-LT: Blykstės režimai: Automatinis; Detalių paryškinimo; Blykstė išjungta; Blykstė išjungta; Priverstinis išjungimas; Priverstinis įjungimas; Greita sinchronizacija; Rankinis; Multi; Normalus; Išankstinė blykstė; Galinė diafragma; Raudonų akių efekto mažinimas; Antrosios diafragmos sinchronizacija; „Slave“ (antrinė); Lėta sinchronizacija; Minkštas; Stroboskopinis; Nuslopintas; TTL; Kita
nl: Flitsmodi: Auto; Invulflits; Flits uit; Flits aan; Gedwongen uit; Gedwongen aan; Snelle synchronisatie; Handmatig; Multi; Normaal; Voorflits; Tweede gordijn; Rode-ogenreductie; Synchronisatie op het tweede gordijn; Slave; Langzame synchronisatie; Zacht; Stroboscopisch; Onderdrukt; TTL; Andere
fi: Salamatilat: Automaattinen; Täyttö; Salama pois päältä; Salama päällä; Pakotettu pois päältä; Pakotettu päälle; Nopea synkronointi; Manuaalinen; Monikosketus; Normaali; Etukäteissalama; Takaverho; Punasilmäisyyden vähentäminen; Toinen verhosynkronointi; Orja; Hidas synkronointi; Pehmeä; Stroboskooppinen; Tukahdutettu; TTL; Muu
bg-BG: Режими на светкавица: Авто; Запълваща; Изключена светкавица; Включена светкавица; Принудително изключване; Принудително включване; Високоскоростна синхронизация; Ръчна; Мулти; Нормална; Предварителна светкавица; Задна завеса; Намаляване на ефекта на червените очи; Синхронизиране на втора завеса; Подчинена; Бавна синхронизация; Мека; Стробоскопична; Потисната; TTL; Други
th: โหมดแฟลช: อัตโนมัติ; แสงเสริม; ปิดแฟลช; เปิดแฟลช; ปิดโฟกัส; เปิดโฟกัส; ซิงค์ความเร็วสูง; มือเข็น; มัลติ; ผิวปกติ; แสงทดสอบ; ม่านชัตเตอร์ชุดหลัง; แก้ตาแดง; ซิงค์กับม่านชัตเตอร์ชุดที่สอง; สเลฟ; ชัตเตอร์ความเร็วต่ำ; นุ่ม; สโตรโบสโคป; ระงับ; TTL; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 闪光模式: 自动; 填充式; 闪光灯关闭; 闪光灯开启; 强制关闭; 强制开启; 高速同步; 手动; 多; 普通; 预闪; 后帘; 减轻红眼; 后帘同步; 光敏; 缓慢同步; 软; 频闪; 抑制; TTL; 其他
pl: Tryby lampy błyskowej: Automatyczna; Wypełnienie; Wyłącz flesz; Włącz flesz; Wymuszone wyłączenie; Wymuszone włączenie; Synchronizacja hi-speed; Ręczny; Multi; Normalny; Błysk wstępny; Tylna kurtyna; Redukcja czerwonych oczu; Synchronizacja drugiej kurtyny; Slave; Powolna synchronizacja; Miękki; Stroboskopowy; Stłumiony; TTL; Inne
fr: Modes de flash: Automatique; Remplissage; Flash désactivé; Flash activé; Flash forcé désactivé; Flash forcé activé; Synchronisation à grande vitesse; Manuel; Multi; Normale; Pré-flash; Rideau arrière; Réduction des yeux rouges; Synchronisation du deuxième rideau; Esclave; Synchronisation lente; Doux; Stroboscopique; Supprimé; TTL; Autre
it: Modalità del flash: Automatica; Di bilanciamento; Flash spento; Flash acceso; Forzato spento; Forzato acceso; Sincronizzazione ad alta velocità; Manuale; Multiple; Normale; Pre-flash; Seconda tendina; Riduzione occhi rossi; Sincronizzazione seconda tendina; Servo; Sincronizzazione lenta; Morbida; Stroboscopico; Soppresso; TTL; Altro
hu: Vakumódok: Automata; Kitöltő; Vaku kikapcsolva; Vaku bekapcsolva; Kényszerített kikapcsolás; Kényszerített bekapcsolás; Gyors szinkronizálás; Manuális; Több; Normál; Elővillantás; Hátsó redőny; Vörösszemhatás-csökkentés; Szinkronizálás a második redőnyre; Segédvaku; Lassú szinkronizálás; Puha; Stroboszkóp; Kikapcsolva; TTL; Egyéb
ko: 플래시 모드: 자동; 필인; 플래시 꺼짐; 플래시 켜짐; 강제 꺼짐; 강제 켜짐; 고속 동조; 수동; 멀티; 일반; 사전 플래시; 후막; 적목 현상 감소; 후막 동조; 슬레이브; 저속 동조; 부드러움; 스트로보스코프; 억제; TTL; 기타
hr-HR: Načini rada bljeskalice: Automatski; Ispunjavanje; Isključena bljeskalica; Uključena bljeskalica; Prisilno isključeno; Prisilno uključeno; Brza sinkronizacija; Ručna; Multi; Normalno; Predbljesak; Stražnja zavjesa; Smanjenje efekta crvenih očiju; Sinkronizacija druge zavjese; Slave; Spora sinkronizacija; Meka; Stroboskopska; Potisnuta; TTL; Ostalo
el: Τρόποι λειτουργίας φλας: Αυτόματος; Πλήρωσης; Απενεργοποίηση φλας; Ενεργοποίηση φλας; Αναγκαστική απενεργοποίηση; Αναγκαστική ενεργοποίηση; Συγχρονισμός υψηλής ταχύτητας; Χειροκίνητο; Multi; Κανονικός; Προ-φλας; Πίσω κουρτίνα; Μείωση κόκκινων ματιών; Συγχρονισμός δεύτερης κουρτίνας; Βοηθητικό; Αργός συγχρονισμός; Μαλακό; Στροβοσκοπικό; Συμπιεσμένο; TTL; Άλλο